Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5664.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 12-1.1-4 and 12-1.1-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-1.1 entitled
"State Crime Laboratory Commission" are hereby amended to read as follows:
12-1.1-4. Membership.
(a) The commission shall consist of five (5) nine (9) members: the attorney general; the
superintendent of state police; the chief justice of the Rhode Island supreme court; the president of
the Rhode Island Bar Association; the public defender; the president of the Rhode Island
Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers; and a representative of the Rhode Island Police Chiefs
Association appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate; and two (2) public
members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. Appointed public
members shall serve two (2) year terms and shall be eligible to succeed themselves.
(b) Members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. Each member
of the board may designate a subordinate within his or her department or agency to represent him
or her at all meetings of the board. Three (3) members of the board shall constitute a quorum and
the vote of a majority of those present and voting shall be required for action.
(c) Members of the commission shall be removable by the governor pursuant to the
provisions of § 36-1-7 of the general laws and for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or
personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.
12-1.1-6. Executive secretary Co-executive secretaries.

The dean deans of the College Colleges of Pharmacy and Engineering at the University of
Rhode Island shall serve as the executive secretary co-executive secretaries of the commission. The
executive secretary and shall oversee the administration of the state crime laboratory, including all
budgetary and personnel matters, and shall provide timely reports to the commission regarding all
matters pertaining to the state crime laboratory.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001673
========
LC001673 - Page 2 of 3